Kentucky statutes. TITLE LI Unified Juvenile Code
CHAPTER 605 Administrative Matters

605.010.
Court-designated workers required.

In each judicial district there shall be a court-designated worker or agency. The number of persons assigned as court-designated workers shall be determined by the Administrative Office of the Courts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 4, effective July 1, 1987.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 199 provides: “KRS

446.250

to

446.320

to the contrary notwithstanding, Acts 1986, ch. 423 shall prevail in the event of a conflict between Acts 1986, ch. 423 and other Acts passed by the 1986 regular session of the General Assembly.”

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, § 32.3.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Termination of Parental Rights and Adoption, § 29.1.

605.020.
Supervision of court-designated workers.

Standards for the employment of court-designated workers shall be set by the Administrative Office of the Courts.

If the Administrative Office of the Courts contracts with a public agency for the provision of the court-designated worker or workers, the contract shall specify that it is for the services, in part or in whole, of named personnel of that agency and no others. Personnel of a public agency under contract to the Administrative Office of the Courts selected as court-designated workers shall be selected in the manner set forth in the contract by and between the public agency and the Administrative Office of the Courts; shall be under the control of the Administrative Office of the Courts and the court to which they are assigned; and shall be subject to the same powers, duties, and restrictions as are court-designated workers employed by the Administrative Office of the Courts.

Court-designated workers, whether employed by the Administrative Office of the Courts or by a public agency under contract to the Administrative Office of the Courts, may be disciplined or removed from the position of court-designated worker in the manner specified in the:

Personnel policies for employees of the Administrative Office of the Courts or the personnel policies of the contract agencies as approved by the Administrative Office of the Courts; and

Contract by and between the public agency and the Administrative Office of the Courts.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall not contract with private corporations, persons, or agencies for the services of court-designated workers.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide training to all court-designated workers in:

The administration of evidence-based screening instruments and, for some workers as appropriate, the administration of risk and needs assessments;

Identification of appropriate services for children and families;

Techniques for diversion agreement implementation and supervision;

Identifying and understanding the issues that led to the filing of a complaint, which may include recognition of signs of trauma, disability, behavioral, mental health, or substance abuse issues, in order to determine appropriate referrals; and

Juvenile justice research, best practices, and any other subject deemed appropriate and available.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall collect and track data, and provide an annual report to the oversight council created in KRS

15A.063

containing the following information:

The number and type of complaints received by each court-designated worker;

The outcome of each complaint, including whether a referral was made to the county attorney or the Department for Community Based Services;

The number of children committed to the Department for Community Based Services pursuant to KRS Chapter 620 who were originally charged with status offenses under KRS Chapter 630 or whose cases were amended from status to dependency, neglect, and abuse; and

Whether a child who successfully completed a diversion agreement was, within one (1) year following completion of the agreement, adjudicated a public offender or convicted in the adult court of a criminal offense.

Personally identifiable information of the court-designated worker shall not be provided but shall be retained by the Administrative Office of the Courts to address the need for additional staff training or other appropriate action.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall develop a graduated response protocol, consisting of a continuum of responses from the least restrictive to the most restrictive, for court-designated workers to utilize in response to violations of the terms of a diversion agreement.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall collaborate with the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet and provide technical assistance to judicial districts in implementing the fiscal incentive program established in KRS

15A.062

.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall act as the fiscal agent to receive funds awarded pursuant to KRS

15A.062

.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall, by regulation, establish a form complaint to be used in filing all complaints with the court-designated worker. The form shall contain the requirements of KRS

610.020

, and if the complaint is filed by a school district, shall require that the director of pupil personnel state that he or she documented the home conditions of the student and the intervention strategies attempted, as required by KRS

159.140

, and that he or she attempted to conduct a conference with the child and a parent.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 5, effective July 1, 1987; 2014, ch. 132, § 27, effective July 1, 2015.

605.030.
Duties of court-designated workers.

A court-designated worker may:

Receive complaints;

Review complaints taken by peace officers;

Investigate complaints except neglect, abuse, and dependency;

Perform an initial screening for human trafficking as defined in KRS

529.010

for referral to the cabinet for investigation as a case of dependency, neglect, or abuse;

Dispose of complaints limited to a total of three (3) status or nonfelony public offense complaints per child and, with written approval of the county attorney, one (1) felony complaint that does not involve the commission of a sexual offense or the use of a deadly weapon;

Administer oaths;

Issue summonses;

Issue subpoenas;

Make advisory dispositional recommendations and provide, within forty-eight (48) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, information concerning a child who has chosen to waive the investigation pursuant to KRS

610.100

;

Perform such duties as required by KRS Chapter 645;

Administer evidence-based screenings and assessments to identify the risk and needs of a child and his or her family;

Enter into diversion agreements, including referral to programs or service providers, providing case management and service coordination, assisting with barriers to completion, and monitoring progress;

Impose graduated sanctions, from least restrictive to most restrictive, in response to violations of the terms of a diversion agreement;

Gather information necessary to track and record outcomes of all diversion agreement recommendations and final diversion disposition;

Collaborate and cooperate with the family accountability, intervention, and response team, director of pupil personnel as appropriate, and service providers to ensure all appropriate interventions are utilized;

Report annually to his or her local public school districts and to the Administrative Office of the Courts an inventory of all programs and service providers within the judicial district they serve;

Request from the schools a student’s education records pursuant to KRS

17.125

; and

Perform such other functions related to activities of children as may be authorized or directed by the court.

Upon the filing of a petition which initiates a formal court action in the interest of the child, the court-designated worker’s involvement, with the exception of the activities defined in subsection (1)(i) of this section, shall cease.

When a child is to be tried as an adult, the court-designated worker need not make dispositional recommendations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 6, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 2, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 358, § 11, effective July 15, 1997; 2013, ch. 25, § 5, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 132, § 28, effective July 15, 2014.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). Under 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 358, sec. 67(1), the amendment of this statute by Section 11 of that Act becomes effective July 15, 1997.

605.035.
Family accountability, intervention, and response teams — Purpose — Membership.

There is hereby created in each judicial district a family accountability, intervention, and response team that shall develop enhanced case management plans and opportunities for services for children referred to the team. The family accountability, intervention, and response team shall consist of not more than fifteen (15) persons.

The membership of the team shall include the following representatives as appointed by their agencies or organizations:

A court-designated worker in that judicial circuit or district;

One (1) or more members, one (1) of whom shall be a representative of the community mental health center, of the regional interagency council specified in KRS 200.509(1)(a) to (d) and (g), or corresponding members of the local interagency council if one exists;

A representative from the cabinet knowledgeable about services available through the cabinet and authorized to facilitate access to services;

A representative from the office of a county attorney within the judicial district;

A representative from the Department of Public Advocacy;

A representative from a local public school within the judicial district;

A representative of law enforcement; and

Other persons interested in juvenile justice issues, as identified by the family accountability, intervention, and response team, who are necessary for a complete representation of resources within each judicial circuit or district.

A court-designated worker from within the judicial circuit or district shall lead the team and be responsible for convening and staffing the team.

The team shall adopt a case management approach and process for reviewing:

Referrals from the court-designated worker involving cases in which a child has failed to appear for a preliminary intake inquiry, declined to enter into a diversion agreement, or failed to complete the terms of the agreement; and

Status offense cases if the court-designated worker, after reviewing the complaint, has determined that no further action is necessary.

After reviewing the actions taken by the court-designated worker, including referrals made for the child and his or her family, efforts to address barriers to successful completion, and whether other appropriate services are available to address the needs of the child and his or her family, the team may:

Refer the case back to the court-designated worker to take further action as recommended by the team; or

Advise the court-designated worker to refer the case to the county attorney if the team has no further recommendations to offer.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 132, § 26, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 167, § 18, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 120, § 7, effective July 14, 2018.

605.040.
Prohibited activities.

A court-designated worker shall not:

Issue arrest or search warrants;

Supervise a child following his adjudication when the child is committed to the cabinet or placed on probation under the supervision of the cabinet or any other agency or individual;

Perform any clerical work not directly related to required juvenile activities;

Investigate child abuse, neglect, or dependency allegations but shall refer such actions to the cabinet; or

Dispose of complaints, except as authorized by KRS

605.030

or

635.010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 7, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 3, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 358, § 12, effective July 15, 1997.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). Under 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 358, sec. 67(1), the amendment of this statute by Section 12 of that Act becomes effective July 15, 1997.

605.050.
Appointment of chief probation officers and volunteer probation officers — Training.

In counties containing a city of the first class or a city with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) as of the most recent federal decennial census, the county judge/executive may appoint a chief probation officer of the juvenile court and such number of assistant probation officers, professional and clerical personnel as may be authorized by the fiscal court. Such officers shall receive reasonable salaries to be fixed by the fiscal court, and shall be allowed their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The salaries and expenses shall be paid out of the county treasury. The officers shall serve at the pleasure of the county judge/executive but shall be subject to the direction and control of the judges of the District Court in the performance of their duties. The officers shall be peace officers who shall possess all the powers of peace officers in carrying out the purposes of KRS Chapters 600 to 645. A probation officer may take into custody any child that he has reasonable grounds to believe is in violation of conditions of his probation.

In counties containing an urban-county government, the mayor shall appoint a chief probation officer of the juvenile session of the District Court and such number of assistant probation officers, professional and clerical personnel as are reasonably necessary for the operation of the juvenile session of the District Court. Such officers shall receive reasonable salaries to be fixed by the urban-county council, and shall be allowed their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The salaries and expenses shall be paid out of the urban-county treasury. The officers shall serve at the pleasure of the mayor but shall be subject to the direction and control of the judges of the District Court in the performance of their duties. The officers shall be peace officers who shall possess all the powers of peace officers in carrying out the purposes of KRS Chapters 600 to 645. A probation officer may take into custody any child that he has reasonable grounds to believe is in violation of conditions of his probation.

In any county, the Chief District Judge may appoint or designate one (1) or more discreet persons of good moral character to serve as volunteer probation officers of the juvenile session. Such volunteer probation officers shall serve during the pleasure of the judge and without compensation, except that the fiscal court or the urban-county council, as appropriate, may authorize the payment of compensation and reasonable expenses out of the county or urban-county treasury of any such officers.

Officers appointed pursuant to this section shall be trained in the administration of a validated risk and needs assessment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 8, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 4, effective April 10, 1988; 1990, ch. 264, § 12, effective July 13, 1990; 2014, ch. 132, § 29, effective July 15, 2014; 2014, ch. 92, § 310, effective January 1, 2015.

605.060.
Duties of probation officers.

Probation officers appointed pursuant to KRS

605.050

shall:

Except as otherwise provided in KRS Chapter 645, make investigations as provided in this chapter, including the administration of a validated risk and needs assessment;

Be present in court to represent the interest of the child when the cases investigated by them are heard, furnish such information as may be required, including the results of a validated risk and needs assessment, advise the court as to the proper disposition of the case and take such charge of the child before and after the hearings as may be ordered;

Visit and supervise children placed on probation and as far as practicable, aid and encourage such children, by friendly advice and admonition, to keep terms of their probation, and provide for their rehabilitation;

Make such reports and records as may be required by the court;

Supervise the transfer of children to and from homes or facilities as directed by the court; and

Work in cooperation with the representatives of the cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 9, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 5, effective April 10, 1988; 2014, ch. 132, § 30, effective July 15, 2014.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, §§ 32.3, 32.13.

605.070.
Duties of court appointed special advocates. [Repealed.]

605.080.
Transportation of children.

Any child ordered to be transported, by a committing or sentencing court, shall be transported by the sheriff or the jailer of that county. Any other law enforcement agency may enter into agreements with the court, sheriff, or jailer to transport juveniles.

Any peace officer who conveys a child from the committing court or from the detention facility of the committing court to a residential treatment facility or other facility operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet shall be allowed an amount prescribed by regulation adopted by the Finance and Administration Cabinet calculated by the nearest traveled route, and shall be paid for all necessary expenses for feeding, lodging, and transporting the child. The officer shall make out a full account of all expenses so incurred by him and give the distance traveled. The account shall be verified by the officer upon oath before the District Court and certified by the circuit clerk to the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, as appropriate, for payment out of funds appropriated to the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet for this purpose. The child’s presence shall be necessary at a postdispositional proceeding only as required by court order for good cause. Transportation shall be provided as in subsection (1) of this section and expenses for transportation of a child to a proceeding from a residential treatment facility or other facility operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet shall be paid out of the State Treasury.

No child shall be transported to any residential treatment facility or other facility, pursuant to order of any court, unless accompanied by an attendant of the same gender, unless that child, when authorized in writing by the court, the Department of Juvenile Justice, or the cabinet, is transported by a parent, grandparent, or adult brother or sister.

The agent of any residential treatment facility or other facility which receives a child transported to the facility shall report any violation of subsection (3) of this section to the Commonwealth’s attorney of the judicial circuit in which the facility is located.

The Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet may transport or pay the necessary traveling expenses of children committed to it for care and treatment from their homes to the residential treatment facility or other facility or home to which they are committed, and the traveling expenses of such children from the facility or home to their homes when discharged or placed on supervised placement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 11, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 6, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 358, § 13, effective July 1, 1997; 1998, ch. 272, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 534, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 257, § 8, effective July 15, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, § 32.11.

605.090.
Alternative treatment for committed children — Notice of inappropriate behavior of child — Procedures for removal of child committed as dependent, neglected, or abused — Reports — Written transfer summary — Placement of public offenders.

Unless precluded by law, any child committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet may by the decision of the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet or its designee, at any time during the period of his or her commitment, be:

Upon fourteen (14) days’ prior written notice to the court, discharged from commitment. Written notice of discharge shall be given to the committing court and to any other parties as may be required by law;

Placed in the home of the child’s parents, in the home of a relative, or a fictive kin, a suitable foster home, or boarding home, upon such conditions as the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet may prescribe and subject to visitation and supervision by a social service worker or juvenile probation and parole officer.

At the time a committed child is placed in the home of his or her parents by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, the parents shall be informed in writing of the conditions of the placement and the criteria that will be used to determine whether removal is necessary.

At the time a committed child is placed anywhere other than the home of the child’s parents, the cabinet or the Department of Juvenile Justice shall inform the foster home, the relative, the fictive kin, or the governing authority of any private facility or agency in which the child has been placed whether the minor placed is a juvenile sexual offender as defined in KRS 635.505(2) or of any inappropriate sexual acts or sexual behavior by the child specifically known to the cabinet or Department of Juvenile Justice, and any behaviors of the child specifically known to the cabinet or Department of Juvenile Justice that indicate a safety risk for the placement. Information received by any private facility or agency under this paragraph shall be disclosed immediately and directly to the individual or individuals who have physical custody of the child.

If, after a placement is made, additional information is obtained by the cabinet or the Department of Juvenile Justice about inappropriate sexual behavior or other behavior of the committed child that may indicate a safety risk for the placement, the cabinet or the Department of Juvenile Justice shall as soon as practicable, but no later than seventy-two (72) hours after the additional information is received, inform the foster parent, relative, fictive kin, or private facility or agency. Additional information received by any private facility or agency shall be disclosed immediately and directly to the individual or individuals who have physical custody of the child.

Information disclosed under this paragraph shall be limited to the acts or behaviors of the committed child and shall not constitute a violation of confidentiality under KRS Chapter 610 or 620. No foster parent, relative, fictive kin, or other person caring for a committed child shall divulge the information received under this paragraph to persons who do not have a legitimate interest or responsibility relating to the case. Nothing in this subparagraph shall prohibit the disclosure or sharing of information between a foster parent, relative, fictive kin, custodian, private facility, or governmental entity for the protection of any child. A violation of this subparagraph is a Class B misdemeanor;

Placed in one (1) of the facilities or programs operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, except that no child committed under the provisions of KRS 610.010(2)(a), (b), or (c) shall be placed in a facility operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice for children adjudicated as a public offender unless the cabinet and the department agree, and the court consents, that the placement is in the best interest of the child and that the placement does not exceed a group home level;

Placed in a child-caring facility operated by a local governmental unit or by a private organization willing to receive the child, upon such conditions as the cabinet may prescribe;

However, under no circumstances shall a child committed under KRS Chapter 620 be placed in a home, facility, or other shelter with a child who has been committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice for commission of a sex crime, as that term is defined in KRS

17.500

, unless the child committed for the commission of a sex crime is kept segregated from other children in the home, facility, or other shelter that have not been committed for the commission of a sex crime;

Treated as provided in KRS Chapter 645;

Following the transfer or placement of a child pursuant to paragraphs (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of this subsection, the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet shall, within fourteen (14) days, excluding weekends and holidays, give written notice to the court of the transfer, the placement, and the reasons therefor.

No child ten (10) years of age or under shall be placed in a facility operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice for children adjudicated as public offenders, except that a child charged with the commission of a capital offense or with an offense designated as a Class A or Class B felony may be detained in a state-operated detention facility when there is no available less restrictive alternative.

If a child committed to the cabinet as dependent, neglected, or abused is placed in the home of the child’s parents, the child shall not be removed except in accordance with the following standards and procedures:

If the social service worker believes that the committed child continues to be dependent, neglected, or abused, but immediate removal is unnecessary to protect the child from imminent death or serious physical injury, the casework situation and evidence shall be reviewed with his supervisor to determine whether to continue work with the family intact or to remove the child. There shall be documentation that the social service worker, prior to the court hearing, made an effort to contact the parents to inform them of the specific problems that could lead to removal so they have an opportunity to take corrective action. If the parents are unavailable or do not respond to attempts to communicate, the specific circumstances shall be documented;

If it appears that the child’s health or welfare or physical, mental, or emotional condition is subjected to or threatened with real and substantial harm and there is not reasonably available an alternative less drastic than removal of the child from the home, the cabinet shall petition the District Court to review the commitment pursuant to KRS

610.120

in relation to the cabinet’s intention to remove the child from the parent’s home. The petition shall set forth the facts which constitute the need for removal of the child. The court shall serve notice of the petition and the time and place of the hearing on the parents; however, the social service worker shall also contact the parents to ensure that they received the notice and are aware of the right to be represented by counsel. If the parents’ whereabouts are unknown, notice may be mailed to the last known address of an adult who is a near relative. If the court fails to find that the child’s health or welfare or physical, mental, or emotional condition is subjected to or threatened with real and substantial harm, or recommends a less drastic alternative that is reasonably available, the child shall not be removed from the parents’ home;

If a social service worker finds a committed, unattended child who is too young to take care of himself, the social service worker shall make reasonable efforts to arrange for an emergency caretaker in the child’s home until the parents return or fail to return within a reasonable time. If no in-home caretaker is available for the child, the social service worker shall request any appropriate law enforcement officer to take the child into protective custody. If, after a reasonable time, it appears the child has been abandoned, the cabinet shall petition the District Court to review the case; or

If there exist reasonable grounds to believe that the child is in danger of imminent death or serious physical injury or is being sexually abused and that the parents are unable or unwilling to protect the child, the social service worker shall, with the assistance of a law enforcement officer, immediately remove the child prior to filing a petition for review. Within seventy-two (72) hours after the removal, the cabinet shall file a petition for review in District Court pursuant to KRS

610.120

with a request for an expeditious hearing. If the court fails to find that the child’s health or welfare or physical, mental, or emotional condition is subjected to or threatened with real and substantial harm, or recommends a less drastic alternative that is reasonably available, the child shall be returned to the parents’ home.

The cabinet or the Department of Juvenile Justice, as appropriate, shall notify the juvenile court of the county of placement with the conditions of supervised placement of each child placed in that county from one (1) of the residential treatment facilities operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet. Notice of the conditions of such placement may be made available by the court to any law enforcement agency.

The person in charge of any home to which a child is probated, and the governing authority of any private facility or agency to which a child is committed, shall make such reports to the court as the court may require, and such reports as the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet may require in the performance of its functions under the law. The Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet shall have the power to make such visitations and inspections of the homes, facilities, and agencies in which children who have committed public offenses have been placed as it deems necessary to carry out its functions under the law.

The Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet shall provide a written transfer summary to the person in charge of any foster home or any governing authority of any private facility or agency in which the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet has placed a child. The written summary shall include, at a minimum, demographic information about the child, a narrative statement detailing the child’s prior placements, the length of time the child has been committed, a description of the services and assistance provided to the child or the child’s family since the most current case plan, a copy of the current case plan for the child and the child’s family, and a copy of the child’s medical and educational passport, if available, provided that no information shall be provided that violates any statutory confidentiality requirements. The transfer summary shall state whether the child placed is a juvenile sexual offender as defined in KRS 635.505(2), and include information required under subsection (1) of this section. The transfer summary shall be provided by the Department of Juvenile Justice if it is responsible for the child, or the cabinet if it is responsible for the child, within seven (7) days of the placement of the child with the person, agency, or facility providing care to the child.

The Department of Juvenile Justice may assist the courts in placing children who have committed public offenses in boarding homes, and, under agreements with the individual courts, may assume responsibility for making such placements. Counties may pay or contribute towards the expenses of maintaining such children and, to the extent authorized by the fiscal court, the Department of Juvenile Justice may incur obligations chargeable to the county for such expenses.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 12, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 7, effective April 10, 1988; 1988, ch. 350, § 142, effective April 10, 1988; 1994, ch. 226, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 358, § 14, effective July 1, 1997; 1998, ch. 57, § 3, effective March 17, 1998; 1998, ch. 398, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 606, § 20, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 62, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 263, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 279, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 182, § 50, effective July 12, 2006; 2008, ch. 87, § 17, effective July 15, 2008; 2017 ch. 10, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

605.093.
Day treatment programs of Department of Juvenile Justice.

By August 1, 2000, the Department of Juvenile Justice shall provide, based on available general fund appropriations, a day treatment program accessible to every school district in each judicial region of the state. The day treatment programs shall combine therapeutic and academic services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 493, § 8, effective April 10, 1998.

605.095.
Department of Juvenile Justice to operate postadjudication facilities and programs — Transfer of juveniles to Department of Corrections facilities.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall operate or contract for the operation of any postadjudication juvenile detention or treatment facility in which a juvenile is confined for a public offense or as a youthful offender.

Not less than one (1) facility specified in subsection (1) of this section shall be a secure facility with a security level comparable to a medium-security adult facility.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall operate or contract for the operation of any postadjudication juvenile treatment, rehabilitation, probation, or parole programs, diversion or alternatives to secure detention programs, or other programs for juvenile offenders to which a juvenile committed as a public offender or sentenced as a youthful offender has been assigned.

A juvenile detained in a department-operated postadjudication detention or treatment facility may be transferred to a Department of Corrections facility at any time as provided by KRS

640.070

or other specific statute.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 358, § 10, effective July 1, 1997; 2002, ch. 257, § 9, effective July 15, 2002.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). Under 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 358, sec. 67(3), this statute becomes effective July 1, 1997, in that it deals with functions of the Department of Juvenile Justice.

605.100.
Care, treatment, and rehabilitation of committed children — Validated needs and risk assessment.

The Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet shall arrange for a program of care, treatment, and rehabilitation of the children committed to it, which program shall be designed to provide for classification, segregation, and specialized treatment of children according to their respective problems, needs, and characteristics, as identified through a validated needs and risk assessment, and to provide a coordinated system of probation and parole services that includes a continuum of graduated sanctions.

The Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet shall be responsible for the operation, management, and development of the existing state facilities for the custodial care and rehabilitation of children committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet under provisions of this chapter. The Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet shall further be responsible for the development of such facilities as are necessary to provide an adequate and modern program for the care, treatment, and rehabilitation of such children.

The facilities and programs under the control of the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet shall be designed and operated in such a manner as to rehabilitate, train, develop, and educate the children to become good citizens and useful members of society.

Suitable programs of vocational education and training shall be carried on in the facilities and programs, with the view of preparing the children for future self-support.

The children in each facility and program shall be employed so far as practicable in labor incident to the maintenance and operation of the facility and program, and in suitable industries conducted by the facilities and programs as a part of the vocational training program.

The superintendent or managing officer of each facility may use, for the maintenance of the facility, the products of farms, dairies, and other departments and industries of the facility or may sell or exchange such products for the benefit of the facility.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 13, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 8, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 358, § 15, effective July 1, 1997; 1998, ch. 443, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 2014, ch. 132, § 31, effective July 15, 2014.

605.102.
Caregiver of committed child to use reasonable and prudent parent standard for child’s participation in age or developmentally appropriate activities — Limitation of liability — Cabinet official’s immunity not abrogated or diminished.

For the purposes of this section, “caregiver” has the same meaning as in 42

U.S.C. sec. 675(10)

(B).

In accordance with 42

U.S.C. sec. 671

, a caregiver shall use the reasonable and prudent parent standard to determine whether to allow a child in the custody of the cabinet to participate in an age or developmentally appropriate extracurricular, enrichment, or social activity.

A caregiver shall not be liable as a result of the caregiver’s approval of the participation of a child who is in the custody of the cabinet in an age or developmentally appropriate activity, so long as the caregiver acts in accordance with the reasonable and prudent parent standard. No provision in any agreement between the cabinet and a caregiver shall diminish the standard of care as set forth by this statute.

Nothing in this section is intended to abrogate or diminish the immunities of a cabinet official acting in the course and scope of the cabinet official’s employment or create a legal duty on the part of a cabinet official.

The cabinet, in conjunction with the child’s caregiver, shall utilize the reasonable and prudent parent standard to:

Verify that a child is in the custody of the cabinet and is age or developmentally appropriate to apply for an operator’s license, motorcycle operator’s license, intermediate license, or any instruction permit in accordance with KRS

186.450

or

186.470

; or

Request that a child’s operator’s license, motorcycle license, intermediate license, or any instruction permit be cancelled in accordance with KRS

186.470

.

The cabinet shall promulgate an administrative regulation to implement subsection (5) of this section.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 115, § 4, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 11, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2016). 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 115, sec. 4 directed that a new section of KRS Chapter 600 be created for the text of this statute. The subject matter of KRS Chapter 600 relates to introductory matters of the Unified Juvenile Code, KRS Chapters 600 to 645. Since this statute specifically addresses the standard of judgment a caregiver of a committed child must exercise in allowing participation in age or developmentally appropriate activities, in codification the Reviser of Statutes created a new section of KRS Chapter 605, which addresses administrative matters pertaining to committed children, as a more appropriate statutory designation under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(a).